Washington statutes.
RCW 14.08.300

Governing body of district.

The governing body of a county airport district shall be the board of county commissioners except as in this chapter provided.

[ 1951 c 114 s 1; 1945 c 182 s 13; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 2722-42.]